software/apertium.r48232/apertium-en-es/apertium-en-es.es-lextor.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="ISO-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet/>
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre-determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="detnt" c="Determiner neuter(?)"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" c="Location (not locative!)"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" c="Anthroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="al" c="Other (altre)"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" c="Cognomen (family name)"/> 
    <sdef n="atn" c="Atonic"/> 
    <sdef n="enc" c="Enclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="pro" c="Proclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="tn" c="Tonic"/> 
    <sdef n="n" c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="f" c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="m" c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Preadverb"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="nn" c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="an" c="Animate / inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="aa" c="Animate"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="det" c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="def" c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" c="Verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="Verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" c="Verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" c="Gerund"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" c="Imperfect indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="ifi" c="Preterite indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="fti" c="Future indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="cni" c="Conditional"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" c="Imperative subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="fts" c="Future subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" c="Singular / plural"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="num" c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="pron" c="Pronominal"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" c="Sentence marker"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest" c="Left question mark"/> 
    <sdef n="web" c="URL address"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <sdef n="percent" c="Percentage"/> 
    <sdef n="time" c="Time"/> 
    <sdef n="guio" c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="past" c="Past"/> 
    <sdef n="sep" c="Separable verb"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" c="Synthetic"/> 
    <sdef n="email" c="Email"/> 
    <sdef n="obj" c="Object"/> 
    <sdef n="subj" c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="subs" c="Substantive"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="vbdo" c="The verb 'to do'"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" c="Present tense (indicative)"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" c="Auxiliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="ND" c="Number to be determined"/> 
    <sdef n="GD" c="Gender to be determined"/> 
    <sdef n="mon" c="Currency / valuta"/> 
  </sdefs>
<pardefs>

<pardef n="Abc">
    <e><re>[ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ][ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]*</re></e>

    </pardef>
<pardef n="two(1)__num">
    <e><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>


    


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>


    


    </pardef>
<pardef n="three__num">
    <e><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l>cientos<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r>cientos<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l>cientos<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r>cientos<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>


    


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>
<pardef n="three(1)__num">
    <e><p><l><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>
<pardef n="twenty__num">
    <e><p><l/><r/></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>un</l><r><b/>y<b/>un</r></p><par n="two(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>dos</l><r><b/>y<b/>dos</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>tres</l><r><b/>y<b/>tres</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>cuatro</l><r><b/>y<b/>cuatro</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>cinco</l><r><b/>y<b/>cinco</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>seis</l><r><b/>y<b/>seis</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>siete</l><r><b/>y<b/>siete</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>ocho</l><r><b/>y<b/>ocho</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>y<b/>nueve</l><r><b/>y<b/>nueve</r></p><par n="three(1)__num"/></e>


    </pardef>
<pardef n="one__num">
    <e><p><l>cien<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r>cien<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>
<pardef n="thirty_hundred__num">
    <e><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>cien<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>cien<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>doscientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>doscientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>trescientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>trescientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>cuatrocientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>cuatrocientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>quinientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>quinientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>seiscientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>seiscientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>setecientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>setecientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>ochocientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>ochocientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l><b/>mil<b/>novecientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><b/>mil<b/>novecientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>
<pardef n="arabic-roman-ones-ord(1)">
    <e><p><l>I</l><r>I</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>II</l><r>II</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>III</l><r>III</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>IV</l><r>IV</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>V</l><r>V</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>VI</l><r>VI</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>VII</l><r>VII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>VIII</l><r>VIII</r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>IX</l><r>IX</r></p></e>

    </pardef>
<pardef n="arabic-roman-ones-ord">
    <e><p><l/><r/></p></e>

    <e><par n="arabic-roman-ones-ord(1)"/></e>

    </pardef>

    <e><p><l>dos</l><r>dos</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>tres</l><r>tres</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>cuatro</l><r>cuatro</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>cinco</l><r>cinco</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>seis</l><r>seis</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>siete</l><r>siete</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ocho</l><r>ocho</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>nueve</l><r>nueve</r></p><par n="three__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l/><r/></p><par n="one__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>veinte</l><r>veinte</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>treinta</l><r>treinta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>cuarenta</l><r>cuarenta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>cincuenta</l><r>cincuenta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>sesenta</l><r>sesenta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>setenta</l><r>setenta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ochenta</l><r>ochenta</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e><p><l>noventa</l><r>noventa</r></p><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
